Illinois, session 104th, SB4044.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Agricultural Land Conservation Act. 6    Section 5. Findings and intent. The General Assembly 7hereby reiterates the legislative findings and statement of 8intent set forth in Section 2 of the Farmland Preservation Act 9and further finds that:10        (1) According to a 2024 report published by the 11    Department of Agriculture at the University of Illinois at 12    Urbana-Champaign, midwestern states lost over 1.5 million 13    acres of agricultural land to development between 2001 and 14    2021, with the highest losses occurring in Illinois.15        (2) Each year in Illinois, thousands of acres of 16    agricultural land are rezoned and developed into 17    industrial, commercial, and residential areas.18        (3) Soil and water conservation districts are units of 19    local government, but they lack taxing authority.20        (4) Soil and water conservation district employees 21    serve as the critical infrastructure in every county in 22    Illinois, administering vital State and federal 23    conservation programs. They are on the front lines of   SB4044- 2 -LRB104 17650 BDA 31081 b1    addressing pressing environmental challenges, including 2    improving water quality, enhancing soil health, and 3    building resilience to the increasingly severe impacts of 4    climate change. Their work is foundational to achieving 5    environmental goals, and their presence on the ground 6    ensures that these efforts reach the necessary scale.7        (5) Unstable or intermittent funding threatens to 8    undermine the capacity of soil and water conservation 9    districts to deliver programs that support farmers, 10    landowners, and communities across the State. Without 11    adequate staffing, Illinois risks losing the ability to 12    put federal funds earmarked for conservation and climate 13    resilience onto the ground in Illinois. Moreover, it puts 14    at risk the progress made in addressing water quality 15    issues, mitigating flooding, and improving soil 16    sustainability. 17    Section 10. Agricultural land; defined. In this Act, 18"agricultural land" means land that is intensively used and 19managed for the production of food and fiber. "Agricultural 20land" includes cropland; hay land; pastures, including native 21pastures and rangeland; orchards; vineyards; areas that 22support wetland crops; other lands used to support the 23production of livestock; and small tree farms. 24    Section 15. Farmland Conversion Fee Fund. The Farmland   SB4044- 3 -LRB104 17650 BDA 31081 b1Conversion Fee Fund is created as a special fund in the State 2treasury. Revenue generated from the Farmland Conversion Fees 3imposed under Section 20 shall be collected by the Department 4of Agriculture and deposited into the Farmland Conversion Fee 5Fund. Moneys in the Farmland Conversion Fee Fund may be 6expended and distributed by the Department of Agriculture 7exclusively for the following purposes:8        (1) supporting education and programs that support 9    healthy soil, clean water, and climate-smart agricultural 10    practices;11        (2) supporting operations funding for soil and water 12    conservation districts;13        (3) covering costs associated with administering the 14    Act; and15        (4) any other purpose that the Department of 16    Agriculture determines is consistent with the purposes and 17    intent of this Act.18    Before expending moneys for any other purpose, the 19Department of Agriculture shall, subject to the availability 20of moneys in the Fund, ensure that during each State fiscal 21year:(i) $500,000 is distributed to the Department of 22Agriculture for the collection of fees and the administration 23of the program; (ii) at least $10,000,000 is distributed to 24soil and water conservation districts in the State for the 25purposes of paragraph (2). Any remainder may be expended by 26the Department of Agriculture for the purposes enumerated in   SB4044- 4 -LRB104 17650 BDA 31081 b1this Section.2    Beginning in State fiscal year 2027, the amounts described 3in items (i) and (ii) shall be annually increased by the annual 4unadjusted percentage increase (but not less than zero) in the 5consumer price index-u for the 12 months ending with the 6September preceding each November 1, including all previous 7adjustments. In this Section, "consumer price index-u" means 8the index published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the 9United States Department of Labor that measures the average 10change in prices of goods and services purchased by all urban 11consumers, United States city average, all items, 1982-84 = 12100. 13    Section 20. Farmland Conversion Fees.14    (a) Beginning January 1, 2027, a Farmland Conversion Fee 15shall be paid by the buyer or lessee in a transaction for any 16agricultural land that will be removed from production for the 17specific purpose of developing an industrial park, a 18commercial area, or a single-family or multiple-family 19dwelling or for being put to any other use that removes the 20agricultural land from production. This Farmland Conversion 21Fee shall apply to agricultural land that is leased or 22purchased. This Farmland Conversion Fee shall be remitted to 23the Department of Agriculture, in accordance with rules 24adopted by the Department, within 30 days of the purchase or 25lease of the agricultural land by the buyer or lessee. The fee   SB4044- 5 -LRB104 17650 BDA 31081 b1under this Section shall be $275 per acre.2    (b) Revenue from Farmland Conversion Fees shall be 3collected by the Department of Agriculture and deposited into 4the Farmland Conversion Fee Fund.5    (c) Conversion of agricultural land that will be removed 6from production is exempt from the Farmland Conversion Fee if 7it is removed from production for the personal use of a farmer 8or landowner or if it is one or more of the following types of 9agricultural land conversion:10        (1) any conversion of land in which the primary 11    function of the converted area supports agricultural 12    infrastructure, such as livestock operations or grain 13    elevators;14        (2) any conversion of land done by a State agency; 15        (3) any conversion of land done for the creation of 16    high-voltage transmission systems; 17        (4) any conversion of land whose primary purpose is 18    the establishment of conservation practices; or19        (5) any conversion of land for the development of 20    renewable energy providers, limited to wind and solar 21    projects only.22    (d) The Department of Agriculture shall adopt rules to 23implement this Section. 24    Section 25. Enforcement. The Attorney General, in 25conjunction with the Department of Agriculture shall enforce   SB4044- 6 -LRB104 17650 BDA 31081 b1this Act. Any person who fails to pay a Farmland Conversion Fee 2shall be subjected to a penalty equivalent to 3 times the 3Farmland Conversion Fee due, plus interest calculated at a 4rate equal to the yield on 26-week United States Treasury 5bills most recently auctioned prior to the date of the 6determination of the repayment obligation to the Department of 7Agriculture. 8    Section 90. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 9Section 5.1036 as follows: 10    (30 ILCS 105/5.1036 new)11    Sec. 5.1036. The Farmland Conversion Fee Fund. 12    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 13becoming law.